District of Columbia statutes.
22-3320

Obstructing public road; removing milestones.

If any person shall alter or in any manner obstruct or encroach on a public road, or cut, destroy, deface, or remove any milestones set up on such road, or place any rubbish, dirt, logs, or make any pit or hole therein, such person may be indicted, and, upon conviction thereof before the proper court, shall be fined or imprisoned, in the discretion of the court, according to the nature of the offense.

R.S., D.C., § 268

History

1981 Ed., § 22-3120.
1973 Ed., § 22-3120.

Prior Codifications